Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.090

Preparing and distributing information on district's instructional program, operation and maintenance—Limitation.

The board of directors of any school district shall have authority to authorize the expenditure of funds for the purpose of preparing and distributing information to the general public to explain the instructional program, operation and maintenance of the schools of the district: PROVIDED, That nothing contained herein shall be construed to authorize preparation and distribution of information to the general public for the purpose of influencing the outcome of a school district election.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 11. Formerly RCW 28A.58.610, 28.58.610.]

NOTES:

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.150.050.